Washington statutes.
RCW 18.73.250

Epinephrine—Availability—Administration.

(1) All of the state's ambulance and aid services shall make epinephrine available to their emergency medical technicians in their emergency care supplies. The emergency medical technician may administer epinephrine.

(2) Nothing in this section authorizes the administration of epinephrine by a first responder.

[ 2005 c 463 s 1; 2001 c 24 s 1; 1999 c 337 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—1999 c 337: "The legislature finds that allergies are a serious medical disorder that affect more than one in five persons in the United States and are the sixth leading cause of chronic disease. Anaphylaxis is the most severe form of allergic reaction. Rapid and appropriate administration of the drug epinephrine to a patient suffering an anaphylaxis allergic reaction may make the difference between the life and death of that patient. The legislature further finds that some situations may arise when the administration of epinephrine by an emergency medical technician is required to save a person's life and that it is paramount that these valuable emergency response personnel receive the appropriate training on the use of epinephrine to treat anaphylaxis.

It is the purpose of chapter 337, Laws of 1999 to investigate the rate of anaphylaxis statewide and the training and care standards needed to allow emergency medical technicians to administer lifesaving epinephrine." [ 1999 c 337 s 1.]

Effective dates—1999 c 337: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 14, 1999], except for section 4 of this act which takes effect January 1, 2000." [ 1999 c 337 s 5.]

Short title—1999 c 337: "This act may be known and cited as the Kristine Kastner Act." [ 1999 c 337 s 6.]